Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-326
Interpleader; when sheriff or other officer defendant.

The provisions of section 25-325 shall be applicable to an action brought against a sheriff, or other officer, for the recovery of personal property taken by him or her under execution or for the proceeds of such property so taken and sold by him or her. The defendant in such action shall be entitled to the benefit of those provisions against the party in whose favor the execution issued, upon exhibiting to the court the process under which the defendant acted, with his or her affidavit that the property or its proceeds was taken under such process.

R.S.1867, Code § 49, p. 400;

R.S.1913, § 7607;

C.S.1922, § 8550;

C.S.1929, § 20-326;

R.S.1943, § 25-326;

Laws 2006, LB 1115, § 15.